Maine, session 132, LD1361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24 MRSA §2317-B, sub-§12-E, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 307, §1 and
affected by §6, is amended to read:
12-E. Title 24-A, sections 2765 and, 2847-Q and 4257. Coverage for services
provided by independent practice dental hygienists or dental hygienists, Title 24‑A,
sections 2765 and, 2847‑Q and 4257;
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §2765, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §11, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§2765. Coverage for services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or
dental hygienist
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §2765, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §11, is further
amended to read:
1. Services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
An insurer that issues individual dental insurance or health insurance that includes coverage
for dental services shall provide coverage for dental services performed by an independent
practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist licensed under Title 32, chapter 143 when those
services are covered services under the contract and when they are within the lawful scope
of practice of the independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
Sec. 4. 24-A MRSA §2847-Q, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §13, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§2847-Q. Coverage for services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or
dental hygienist
Sec. 5. 24-A MRSA §2847-Q, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §13, is
further amended to read:
1. Services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
An insurer that issues group dental insurance or health insurance that includes coverage for
Page 1 - 132LR1713(03)

dental services shall provide coverage for dental services performed by an independent
practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist licensed under Title 32, chapter 143 when those
services are covered services under the contract and when they are within the lawful scope
of practice of the independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
Sec. 6. 24-A MRSA §4257, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §15, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§4257. Coverage for services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or
dental hygienist
Sec. 7. 24-A MRSA §4257, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 429, §15, is further
amended to read:
1. Services provided by independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
All individual and group health maintenance organization contracts that include coverage
for dental services shall provide coverage for dental services performed by an independent
practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist licensed under Title 32, chapter 143 when those
services are covered services under the contract and when they are within the lawful scope
of practice of the independent practice dental hygienist or dental hygienist.
Page 2 - 132LR1713(03)